Arkansas, session 2025, SB302.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 37, Subchapter 2, is amended to
add an additional section to read as follows:
5-37-229. Gift card fraud — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Card holder" means a person who receives a gift card
through a purchase or a gift;
(2) "Card issuer" means a person or agent of the person that
issues a gift card;
(3) "Gift card" means a physical or electronic payment device
that is:
(A) Usable at a single merchant or affiliated group of
merchants that share the same name, mark, or logo;
(B) Issued in a specified amount and may be increased in
value or reloaded;
(C) Purchased on a prepaid basis in exchange for payment;
and
(D) Honored upon presentation by the card holder to a
*CEB191*
03-11-2025 14:53:01 CEB191

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB302
single merchant or affiliated group of merchants for goods or services;
(4) "Gift card redemption information" means any numeric codes
specific to the activation or redemption of a gift card; and
(5) "Value" means the greatest amount of economic loss the owner
of a gift card could reasonably suffer including without limitation the full
monetary face value or potential value for a variable load gift card.
(b) A person commits the offense of gift card fraud if he or she:
(1) With purpose to defraud, acquires or retains possession of a
gift card or gift card redemption information with the purpose of depriving
the owner of property;
(2) Obtains by deception a gift card or gift card redemption
information from a card holder or card issuer with the purpose of depriving
the owner of property;
(3) Knowingly uses a gift card or gift card redemption
information that has been obtained in violation of subdivision (b)(1) or
(b)(2) of this section for the purpose of obtaining money, goods, services,
or anything else of value.
(c) Gift card fraud is a:
(1) Class B felony if:
(A) The value of a gift card or gift card redemption
information is twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or more; or
(B) The aggregate value of one (1) or more gift cards or
gift card redemption information obtained through multiple violations of
subsection (b) of this section within one hundred twenty (120) days is
twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or more;
(2) Class C felony if:
(A) The value of a gift card or gift card redemption
information is less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) but more than
five thousand dollars ($5,000); or
(B) The aggregate value of one (1) or more gift cards or
gift card redemption information acquired, retained, obtained, or used in
violation of subsection (b) of this section within one hundred twenty (120)
days is less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) but more than five
thousand dollars ($5,000);
(3) Class D felony if:
(A) The value of a gift card or gift card redemption
03-11-2025 14:53:01 CEB191

As Engrossed: S3/11/25 SB302
information is less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) but more than one
thousand dollars ($1,000); or
(B) The aggregate value of one (1) or more gift cards or
gift card information acquired, retained, obtained, or used in violation of
subsection (b) of this section within one hundred twenty (120) days is less
than five thousand dollars ($5,000) but more than one thousand dollars
($1,000); or
(4) Class A misdemeanor if:
(A) The value of a gift card or gift card information is
less than one thousand dollars ($1,000); or
(B) The aggregate value of one (1) or more gift cards or
gift card information acquired, retained, obtained, or used in violation of
subsection (b) of this section within one hundred twenty (120) days is less
than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

SECTION 2. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that gift card fraud is a pervasive
problem in the state; that businesses and consumers suffer the economic
consequences of such crimes; and that this act is immediately necessary to
provide a deterrent against gift card fraud and protect the economy of the
state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being
immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and
safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/Gilmore





03-11-2025 14:53:01 CEB191